Utah statutes.
16-7-7.   Right to act without authorization from members -- Sale of property.

Any corporation sole created under this chapter, and any such archbishop, bishop, president, trustee in trust, president of stake, president of congregation, overseer, presiding elder or clergyman of the state of Utah, who holds the title to trust property for the use and benefit of any church or religious society and who is not so incorporated, unless the articles of incorporation or deed under which such corporation or individual trustee holds such property provides otherwise, shall have power without any authority or authorization from the members of such church or religious society to mortgage, exchange, sell and convey the same; and any such corporation sole, or individual trustee residing within this state may hold title to property, real or personal, which is situated in any other state or jurisdiction; which holding shall be subject to the same conditions, limitations, powers and rights and with the same trusts, duties and obligations in regard to the property that like property is held for such purposes in this state.

